Missouri, session 2026, HB2802.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 9.010, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 9.010 and 173.015, to read as follows:
9.010. The first day of January, the third Monday of January, the twelfth day of
February, the third Monday in February, the eighth day of May, the last Monday in May, the
nineteenth day of June, the fourth day of July, the first Monday in September, the second
Monday in October, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years, the eleventh day of November, the fourth Thursday in November, and the
twenty-fifth of December, are declared and established public holidays; and when any of such
holidays falls upon Sunday, the Monday next following shall be considered the holiday.
There shall be no holiday for state employees on the fourth Monday of October.
173.015. The board shall require that all colleges and universities be closed on
the general election day, unless such college or university serves as a polling place.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.